Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Revised Uniform Principal and Income Act

386.190.
Definitions for KRS 386.190 to 386.340. [Repealed.]

386.191.
Definitions for KRS 386.191 to 386.349. [Repealed.]

386.195.
Rules of trust administration. [Repealed.]

386.200.
Application of KRS 386.190 to 386.340 — Powers of settlor. [Repealed.]

386.205.
Definition of income and principal. [Repealed.]

386.210.
Receipts of money or property, when deemed income and when deemed principal — Disposition of income and principal. [Repealed.]

386.215.
Income interest — Income beneficiary. [Repealed.]

386.220.
Apportionment of income. [Repealed.]

386.225.
Determination and distribution of income. [Repealed.]

386.230.
Corporate dividends and share rights. [Repealed.]

386.235.
Corporate distribution of shares. [Repealed.]

386.240.
Bonds or other obligations for the payment of money. [Repealed.]

386.245.
Corporate securities. [Repealed.]

386.250.
Principal used in business. [Repealed.]

386.255.
Net profits of business. [Repealed.]

386.260.
Principal comprising animals. [Repealed.]

386.265.
Royalties and other receipts from disposition of natural resources. [Repealed.]

386.270.
Disposition of natural resources. [Repealed.]

386.275.
Timber. [Repealed.]

386.280.
Principal subject to depletion. [Repealed.]

386.285.
Other depletable property. [Repealed.]

386.290.
Unproductive principal. [Repealed.]

386.295.
Delayed income from sale of underproductive property. [Repealed.]

386.300.
Expenses incurred in connection with trust estate. [Repealed.]

386.305.
Charges against income. [Repealed.]

386.310.
Expenses of nontrust estates. [Repealed.]

386.315.
Apportionment of expenses. [Repealed.]

386.320.
Uniformity of interpretation. [Repealed.]

386.325.
Application of KRS 386.191 to 386.459. [Repealed.]

386.330.
Citation of KRS 386.190 to 386.340. [Repealed.]

386.335.
Construction of KRS 386.191 to 386.349. [Repealed.]

386.340.
Time of application of KRS 386.190 to 386.340. [Repealed.]

386.345.
Effective date — Application on receipts and expenses. [Repealed.]

386.349.
Short title. [Repealed.]